Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1028
Garnishee; failure to answer; presumption; judgment.

If the garnishee fails to answer, as required by section 25-1026, he shall be presumed to be indebted to the defendant in the full amount of the claim of plaintiff. Upon notice to the garnishee given within such time and in such manner as the court shall direct, judgment may be entered for such amount as the court may find due from the garnishee.

R.S.1867, Code § 223, p. 430;

R.S.1913, § 7757;

C.S.1922, § 8701;

C.S.1929, § 20-1028;

R.S.1943, § 25-1028;

Laws 1951, c. 67, § 5, p. 204.

If the garnishee fails to answer interrogatories, it is presumed that the garnishee is indebted to the judgment debtor in the full amount of the judgment creditor's claim. This is a rebuttable presumption. Petersen v. Central Park Properties, 275 Neb. 220, 745 N.W.2d 884 (2008).

A presumption of indebtedness arising under this section is rebuttable. Spaghetti Ltd. Partnership v. Wolfe, 264 Neb. 365, 647 N.W.2d 615 (2002).

A notice did not inform the garnishee that if it failed to appear, default judgment would be taken against it. Lee Sapp Leasing v. Ciao Caffe & Espresso, Inc., 10 Neb. App. 948, 640 N.W.2d 677 (2002).